Utah statutes.
63G-6a-2004.   Chief procurement officer's collection of information on procurement items.

(1)  To the extent possible, the chief procurement officer may collect information concerning the type, cost, quality, and quantity of commonly used procurement items procured or used by procurement units.

(2)  The chief procurement officer may make the information described in Subsection (1) available to any procurement unit upon request.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

